Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIX Public Safety and Morals
Penalties

234.990.
Penalties.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS

234.100

to

234.160

shall be guilty of a violation.

Any person who violates any regulation promulgated under provisions of KRS

234.100

to

234.160

and after having been given notice to cease and desist, unless said violation is corrected within ten (10) days, shall be guilty of a violation.

When any person violates any provision of KRS

234.100

to

234.180

or regulations, which violation constitutes a public danger, an immediate notice to cease and desist may be issued, and failure to comply with notice shall be guilty of a violation.

Any person violating the provisions of KRS

234.200

to

234.260

shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.

Any firm or corporation violating the provisions of KRS

234.200

to

234.260

shall be guilty of a violation.

Any person violating any provision of KRS

234.430

shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor. Upon conviction of a second offense, he shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

Any person violating any provision of KRS

234.190

shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor. Upon conviction of a second offense, and subsequent offenses, the violator shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 216, § 6; 1952, ch. 25, § 8; 1954, ch. 208, § 8; 1960, ch. 138, § 12; 1960, ch. 176, § 16; 1988, ch. 122, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1992, ch. 44, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 1992, ch. 463, § 27, effective July 14, 1992.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/14/92) This section was amended by two 1992 Acts which do not appear to be in conflict and have been compiled together.